Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB135.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 217.934 is amended to read as follows:
A veteran shall be an eligible patient for hyperbaric oxygen therapy if he or she has:
(1) A diagnosis of traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder that is
attested to by the patient's treating health care provider;
(2) A prescription for hyperbaric oxygen therapy written by his or her treating health
care provider; and
(3) Given written informed consent for the use of HBOT in accordance with KRS
217.936.
Section 2. KRS 217.936 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A veteran or a veteran's legal guardian shall provide written informed consent for
treatment with hyperbaric oxygen therapy in order to receive HBOT to treat
traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder.
(2) At a minimum, the written informed consent shall include:
(a) An explanation of the currently approved products and treatments for the
traumatic brain injury or post-traumatic stress disorder from which the
veteran suffers;
(b) A description of the potentially best and worst outcomes of using hyperbaric
oxygen therapy and a realistic description of the most likely outcome;
(c) A statement that the veteran's health plan or third-party administrator and
provider shall not be obligated to pay for any care or treatments consequent to
the use of hyperbaric oxygen therapy unless they are specifically required to
do so by law or contract; and
(d) A statement that the veteran understands that the patient shall be liable for all
expenses related to the use of hyperbaric oxygen therapy.
(3) The description of potential outcomes required under subsection (2)(b) of this
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1625
section shall:
(a) Include the possibility that new, unanticipated, different, or worse symptoms
may result and that the proposed treatment may hasten death; and
(b) Be based on the treating health care provider's knowledge of the proposed
treatment in conjunction with an awareness of the veteran's condition.
(4) The written informed consent shall be:
(a) Signed by:
1. The veteran; or
2. A legal guardian, if a guardian has been appointed for the veteran; and
(b) Attested to by the veteran's treating health care provider and a witness.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/11/2025 11:01 AM Jacketed